Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1476
Advertisement; untrue, deceptive, or misleading; unlawful.

After July 19, 1980, it shall be unlawful for any person, firm, corporation, or association, with intent to sell or in any way dispose of merchandise, securities, service, or anything offered by such person, firm, corporation, or association, directly or indirectly, to the public for sale or distribution, or with intent to increase the consumption thereof, or to induce the public in any manner to enter into any obligation relating thereto, or to acquire title thereto, or an interest therein, to make, publish, disseminate, circulate or place before the public, or cause, directly or indirectly, to be made, published, disseminated, circulated or placed before the public, in this state, in a newspaper or other publication, or in the form of a book, notice, handbill, poster, bill, circular, pamphlet or letter, or in any other way, an advertisement of any sort regarding merchandise, securities, service, or anything so offered to the public, containing any assertion, representation, or statement of fact which is known to be untrue, deceptive, or misleading.

Laws 1980, LB 185, § 1.